Washington statutes.
RCW 9.92.066

Termination of suspended sentence—Restoration of civil rights—Vacation of conviction.

(1) Upon termination of any suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, such person may apply to the court for restoration of his or her civil rights not already restored by RCW 29A.08.520. Thereupon the court may in its discretion enter an order directing that such defendant shall thereafter be released from all penalties and disabilities resulting from the offense or crime of which he or she has been convicted.

(2)(a) Upon termination of a suspended sentence under RCW 9.92.060 or 9.95.210, the person may apply to the sentencing court for a vacation of the person's record of conviction under RCW 9.94A.640. The court may, in its discretion, clear the record of conviction if it finds the person has met the equivalent of the tests in RCW 9.94A.640(2) as those tests would be applied to a person convicted of a crime committed before July 1, 1984.

(b) The clerk of the court in which the vacation order is entered shall immediately transmit the order vacating the conviction to the Washington state patrol identification section and to the local police agency, if any, which holds criminal history information for the person who is the subject of the conviction. The Washington state patrol and any such local police agency shall immediately update their records to reflect the vacation of the conviction, and shall transmit the order vacating the conviction to the federal bureau of investigation. A conviction that has been vacated under this section may not be disseminated or disclosed by the state patrol or local law enforcement agency to any person, except other criminal justice enforcement agencies.

[ 2009 c 325 s 2; 2003 c 66 s 2; 1971 ex.s. c 188 s 3.]

NOTES:

Applicability—1984 c 209: See RCW 9.92.900.